Nevada, session 83, SB24.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 441A.195 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
441A.195 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 259.047, a
law enforcement officer, correctional officer, emergency medical
attendant, firefighter, county coroner or medical examiner or any of
their employees or volunteers, any other person who is employed by
or is a volunteer for an agency of criminal justice or any other public
employee or volunteer for a public agency who, in the course of his
or her official duties, comes into contact with human blood or
bodily fluids, or the employer of such a person or the public agency
for which the person volunteers, may petition a court for an order
requiring the testing of a person or decedent for exposure to a
communicable disease if:
(a) The officer, emergency medical attendant, firefighter, county
coroner or medical examiner or their employee or volunteer, other
person employed by or volunteering for an agency of criminal
justice or other public employee or volunteer for a public agency
was likely exposed to a communicable disease; and
(b) Testing of the person or decedent is necessary to determine
the appropriate treatment for the officer, emergency medical
attendant, firefighter, county coroner, medical examiner, employee
or volunteer.
2. When possible, before filing a petition pursuant to
subsection 1, the person, employer or public agency for which the
person volunteers, and who is petitioning shall submit information
concerning the likely exposure to a communicable disease to the
designated health care officer for the employer or public agency or,
if there is no designated health care officer, the person designated by
the employer or public agency to document and verify likely
exposure to communicable diseases, for verification that there was
substantial exposure. Each designated health care officer or person
designated by an employer or public agency to document and verify
likely exposure to communicable diseases shall establish guidelines
based on current scientific information to determine substantial
exposure.
3. A court shall promptly hear a petition filed pursuant to
subsection 1 and determine whether there is probable cause to
believe that a likely transfer of blood or other bodily fluids occurred
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
between the person who filed the petition or on whose behalf the
petition was filed and the person or decedent who likely exposed
him or her to a communicable disease. If the court determines that
such probable cause exists, the court shall:
(a) Order the person who likely exposed the petitioner, or the
person on whose behalf the petition was filed, to a communicable
disease to submit two appropriate specimens to a local hospital or
medical laboratory for testing for exposure to a communicable
disease; or
(b) Order that two appropriate specimens be taken from the
decedent who likely exposed the petitioner, or the person on whose
behalf the petition was filed, to a communicable disease and be
submitted to a local hospital or medical laboratory for testing for
exposure to the communicable disease.
 The local hospital or medical laboratory shall perform the test in
accordance with generally accepted medical practices and shall
disclose the results of the test in the manner set forth in
NRS 629.069.
4. If a judge or a justice of the peace enters an order pursuant to
this section, the judge or justice of the peace may authorize the
designated health care officer or the person designated by the
employer or public agency to document and verify likely exposure
to a communicable disease to sign the name of the judge or justice
of the peace on a duplicate order. Such a duplicate order shall be
deemed to be an order of the court. As soon as practicable after the
duplicate order is signed, the duplicate order must be returned to the
judge or justice of the peace who authorized the signing of it and
must indicate on its face the judge or justice of the peace to whom it
is to be returned. The judge or justice of the peace, upon receiving
the returned order, shall endorse the order with his or her name and
enter the date on which the order was returned. Any failure of the
judge or justice of the peace to make such an endorsement and entry
does not in and of itself invalidate the order.
5. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 629.069, all records
submitted to the court in connection with a petition filed pursuant to
this section and any proceedings concerning the petition are
confidential and the judge or justice of the peace shall order the
records and any record of the proceedings to be sealed and to be
opened for inspection only upon an order of the court for good cause
shown.
6. A court may establish rules to allow a judge or justice of the
peace to conduct a hearing or issue an order pursuant to this section
by electronic or telephonic means.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
7. The employer of a person or the public agency for which the
person volunteers, who files a petition or on whose behalf a petition
is filed pursuant to this section or the insurer of the employer or
public agency, shall pay the cost of performing the test pursuant to
subsection 3.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Agency of criminal justice” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 179A.030.
(b) “Emergency medical attendant” means a person who is:
(1) Licensed as an attendant or certified as an emergency
medical responder, emergency medical technician, advanced
emergency medical technician or paramedic pursuant to chapter
450B of NRS; or
(2) Authorized to practice as an emergency medical
technician, advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic in
this State under the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services
Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact ratified by NRS 450B.145.
Sec. 2. Chapter 450B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“Emergency medical responder” means a person who is
certified by the health officer as having satisfactorily completed a
program of training for certification as an emergency medical
responder pursuant to NRS 450B.1905.
Sec. 3. NRS 450B.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.020 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 450B.025 to
450B.110, inclusive, and section 2 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 4. NRS 450B.0605 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.0605 “Certificate” means a certificate issued by a health
authority acknowledging the successful completion of a program of
training as an emergency medical responder, emergency medical
technician, advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic as
identified on the certificate.
Sec. 5. NRS 450B.0703 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.0703 “Emergency response employee” means a
firefighter, attendant, volunteer attendant, emergency medical
responder, emergency medical technician, advanced emergency
medical technician, emergency medical dispatcher, paramedic, law
enforcement officer, correctional officer, other peace officer or
person who is employed by an agency of criminal justice, including,
without limitation, a law enforcement dispatcher, county coroner or
medical examiner or any of their employees, any other public
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
employee whose duties may require him or her to come into contact
with human blood or bodily fluids or any other person who, in the
course of his or her professional duties, responds to emergencies in
this State.
Sec. 6. NRS 450B.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.130 1. The board shall adopt regulations establishing
reasonable minimum standards for:
(a) Sanitation in ambulances and air ambulances;
(b) Medical and nonmedical equipment and supplies to be
carried in ambulances and medical equipment and supplies to be
carried in air ambulances and vehicles of a fire-fighting agency;
(c) Interior configuration, design and dimensions of ambulances
placed in service after July 1, 1979;
(d) Permits for operation of ambulances, air ambulances and
vehicles of a fire-fighting agency;
(e) Records to be maintained by an operator of an ambulance or
air ambulance or by a fire-fighting agency; and
(f) Treatment of patients who are critically ill or in urgent need
of treatment.
2. Any regulations adopted by the board pursuant to subsection
1 establishing reasonable minimum standards for a permit for the
operation of an air ambulance or records to be maintained by an
operator of an air ambulance must:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), be based on
the medical aspects of the operation of an air ambulance, including,
without limitation, aspects related to patient care; and
(b) Not be based on economic factors, including, without
limitation, factors related to the prices, routes or nonmedical
services of an air ambulance.
3. The health officers of this state shall jointly adopt
regulations to establish the minimum standards for the certification
or licensure of persons who provide emergency medical care. Upon
adoption of the regulations, each health authority shall adopt the
regulations for its jurisdiction. After each health authority adopts the
regulations, the standards established constitute the minimum
standards for certification or licensure of persons who provide
emergency medical care in this state. Any changes to the minimum
standards must be adopted jointly by the health officers and by each
health authority in the manner set forth in this subsection. Any
changes in the minimum standards which are not adopted in the
manner set forth in this subsection are void.
4. A health officer may adopt regulations that impose
additional requirements for the certification or licensure of persons
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
who provide emergency medical care in the jurisdiction of the
health officer, but the health officer must accept the certification or
licensure of a person who provides emergency medical care from
the jurisdiction of another health officer as proof that the person
who provides emergency medical care has met the minimum
requirements for certification or licensure.
5. As used in this section, “person who provides emergency
medical care” means an emergency medical responder, emergency
medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician,
paramedic, attendant of an ambulance or air ambulance or
firefighter employed by or serving with a fire-fighting agency.
Sec. 7. NRS 450B.151 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.151 1. The Committee on Emergency Medical
Services, consisting of 11 members appointed by the State Board of
Health, is hereby created.
2. Upon request of the State Board of Health, employee
associations that represent persons that provide emergency medical
services, including, without limitation, physicians and nurses that
provide emergency medical services, emergency medical
responders, emergency medical technicians, ambulance attendants,
firefighters, fire chiefs and employees of rural hospitals, shall
submit to the State Board of Health written nominations for
appointments to the Committee.
3. After considering the nominations submitted pursuant to
subsection 2, the State Board of Health shall appoint to the
Committee:
(a) One member who is a physician licensed pursuant to chapter
630 or 633 of NRS and who has experience providing emergency
medical services;
(b) One member who is a registered nurse and who has
experience providing emergency medical services;
(c) One member who is a volunteer for an organization that
provides emergency medical services pursuant to this chapter;
(d) One member who is employed by a fire-fighting agency at
which some of the firefighters and persons who provide emergency
medical services for the agency are employed and some serve as
volunteers;
(e) One member who is employed by an urban fire-fighting
agency;
(f) One member who is employed by or serves as a volunteer
with a medical facility that is located in a rural area and that
provides emergency medical services;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(g) One member who is employed by an organization that
provides emergency medical services in an air ambulance and
whose duties are closely related to such emergency medical
services;
(h) One member who is employed by or serves as a volunteer
with a local governmental agency that provides emergency medical
services but which is not a part of a fire-fighting agency or law
enforcement agency;
(i) One member who is employed by a privately owned entity
that provides emergency medical services; and
(j) One member who is employed by an operator of a service
which is:
(1) Provided for the benefit of the employees of an industry
who become sick or are injured at the industrial site; and
(2) Staffed by employees who are licensed attendants and
perform emergency medical services primarily for the industry.
4. The Committee shall solicit and accept applications from
persons who are employed by or volunteer with an agency,
organization or other operator that provides emergency medical
services on tribal land. After considering the applications submitted
pursuant to this subsection, the Committee shall recommend and the
State Board of Health shall appoint to the Committee one member
who is employed by or volunteers with an agency, organization or
other operator that provides emergency medical services on tribal
land.
5. In addition to the members set forth in subsections 3 and 4,
the following persons are ex officio members of the Committee:
(a) An employee of the Division, appointed by the
Administrator of the Division, whose duties relate to administration
and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter;
(b) The county health officer appointed pursuant to NRS
439.290 in each county whose population is 100,000 or more, or the
county health officer’s designee;
(c) A physician who is a member of a committee which consists
of directors of trauma centers in this State and who is nominated by
that committee; and
(d) A representative of a committee or group which focuses on
the provision of emergency medical services to children in this State
and who is nominated by that committee or group.
6. The term of each member appointed by the State Board of
Health is 2 years. A member may not serve more than two
consecutive terms but may serve more than two terms if there is a
break in service of not less than 2 years.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
7. The State Board of Health shall not appoint to the
Committee two persons who are employed by or volunteer with the
same organization, except the State Board of Health may appoint a
person who is employed by or volunteers with the same
organization of which a member who serves ex officio is an
employee.
8. Each member of the Committee shall appoint an alternate to
serve in the member’s place if the member is temporarily unable to
perform the duties required of him or her pursuant to NRS 450B.151
to 450B.154, inclusive.
9. A position on the Committee that becomes vacant before the
end of the term of the member must be filled in the same manner as
the original appointment.
Sec. 8. NRS 450B.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.180 1. Any person desiring certification as an
emergency medical responder, emergency medical technician,
advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic must apply to
the health authority using forms prescribed by the health authority.
2. The health authority, pursuant to regulations and procedures
adopted by the board, shall make a determination of the applicant’s
qualifications to be certified as an emergency medical responder,
emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical
technician or paramedic and shall issue the appropriate certificate to
each qualified applicant.
3. A certificate is valid for a period not exceeding 2 years and
may be renewed if the holder of the certificate complies with the
provisions of this chapter and meets the qualifications set forth in
the regulations and standards established by the board pursuant to
this chapter. The regulations and standards established by the board
must provide for the completion of:
(a) A course of instruction, within 2 years after initial
certification, relating to the medical consequences of an act of
terrorism that involves the use of a weapon of mass destruction. The
course must provide at least 4 hours of instruction that includes
instruction in the following subjects:
(1) An overview of acts of terrorism and weapons of mass
destruction;
(2) Personal protective equipment required for acts of
terrorism;
(3) Common symptoms and methods of treatment associated
with exposure to, or injuries caused by, chemical, biological,
radioactive and nuclear agents;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
(4) Syndromic surveillance and reporting procedures for acts
of terrorism that involve biological agents; and
(5) An overview of the information available on, and the use
of, the Health Alert Network.
 The board may thereafter determine whether to establish
regulations and standards requiring additional courses of instruction
relating to the medical consequences of an act of terrorism that
involves the use of a weapon of mass destruction.
(b) Training before initial certification concerning identifying
and interacting with persons with developmental disabilities.
Training completed pursuant to this paragraph also satisfies the
requirement for such training prescribed by NRS 289.605 or
450B.160, if applicable.
4. The health authority may suspend or revoke a certificate if it
finds that the holder of the certificate no longer meets the prescribed
qualifications. Unless the certificate is suspended by the district
court pursuant to NRS 425.540, the holder of the certificate may
appeal the suspension or revocation of his or her certificate pursuant
to regulations adopted by the board.
5. The board shall determine the procedures and techniques
which may be performed by an emergency medical responder,
emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical
technician or paramedic.
6. A certificate issued pursuant to this section is valid
throughout the State, whether issued by the Division or a district
board of health.
7. The Division shall maintain a central registry of all
certificates issued pursuant to this section, whether issued by the
Division or a district board of health.
8. The board shall adopt such regulations as are necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Act of terrorism” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.4415.
(b) “Biological agent” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.442.
(c) “Chemical agent” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.4425.
(d) “Developmental disability” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 435.007.
(e) “Radioactive agent” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 202.4437.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
(f) “Weapon of mass destruction” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 202.4445.
Sec. 9. NRS 450B.1905 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.1905 1. A program of training for certification as an
emergency medical responder or emergency medical technician
must be:
(a) Supervised by a physician and approved by the health
authority; or
(b) Presented by a national organization which is nationally
recognized for providing such training and approved by the board.
2. A program of training for certification as an emergency
medical responder or emergency medical technician must follow
the curriculum or educational standards prepared by the United
States Department of Transportation as a national standard for
emergency medical responders or emergency medical technicians.
3. The board may adopt regulations which prescribe other
requirements of training for certification as an emergency medical
responder or emergency medical technician.
4. An owner of an ambulance shall not offer emergency
medical care to a patient in urgent need of medical care or
observation unless the attendant has successfully completed a
program of training for certification as an emergency medical
technician or is exempt, pursuant to subsection 7 of NRS 450B.160,
from the requirement to obtain that training.
5. The board may by regulation prescribe additional
requirements for receiving and maintaining certification as an
emergency medical responder or emergency medical technician.
The curriculum or educational standards for training must be:
(a) At the level of advanced first aid; or
(b) At least equivalent to any curriculum or educational
standards prepared by the Department of Transportation as a
national standard for emergency medical responders or emergency
medical technicians [.] , as applicable.
Sec. 10. NRS 450B.255 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.255 A person shall not represent himself or herself to be
an emergency medical responder, emergency medical technician,
advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic unless the
person has been issued a currently valid certificate by the health
authority or is practicing under the Recognition of Emergency
Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact ratified by
NRS 450B.145.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
Sec. 11. NRS 450B.460 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.460 “Person who administers emergency medical
services” means a paid or volunteer firefighter, law enforcement
officer, emergency medical responder, emergency medical
technician, advanced emergency medical technician, paramedic,
ambulance attendant or other person trained to provide emergency
medical services.
Sec. 12. NRS 450B.712 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.712 1. An authorized entity may obtain an order for
auto-injectable epinephrine from a physician, osteopathic physician,
physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse, pursuant
to NRS 630.374, 632.239 or 633.707 to be maintained by the
authorized entity at any location under control of the authorized
entity where allergens capable of causing anaphylaxis may be
present. If a dose of auto-injectable epinephrine maintained by the
authorized entity is used or expires, the authorized entity may obtain
an additional dose of auto-injectable epinephrine to replace the used
or expired dose.
2. Auto-injectable epinephrine maintained by an authorized
entity pursuant to this section may be provided to a person for self-
administration or may be administered to any person reasonably
believed to be experiencing anaphylaxis by:
(a) An owner, employee or agent of the authorized entity who
has received the training required pursuant to NRS 450B.714; or
(b) A person, other than an owner, employee or agent of the
authorized entity, who is trained to recognize the symptoms of
anaphylaxis and to administer auto-injectable epinephrine, who may
include, without limitation, a provider of health care, a provider of
emergency medical services, an athletic trainer or a family member
of a person who suffers from allergies capable of causing
anaphylaxis.
3. An authorized entity shall:
(a) Store auto-injectable epinephrine in a designated, secure
location that is easily accessible and in compliance with the
instructions provided by the manufacturer of the auto-injectable
epinephrine and any requirements prescribed by the board; and
(b) Designate one or more employees or agents who have
received the training described in NRS 450B.714 to be responsible
for the storage, maintenance and oversight of the auto-injectable
epinephrine maintained by the authorized entity.
4. Not later than 30 days after a dose of auto-injectable
epinephrine maintained by an authorized entity is administered, the
authorized entity shall report, on a form prescribed by the board, the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
circumstances surrounding such administration. The board shall
publish an annual report summarizing and analyzing the information
reported by authorized entities pursuant to this subsection.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Provider of emergency medical services” means a person
who is:
(1) Licensed as an attendant or certified as an emergency
medical responder, emergency medical technician, advanced
emergency medical technician or paramedic pursuant to this
chapter; or
(2) Authorized to practice as an emergency medical
technician, advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic in
this State under the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services
Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact ratified by NRS 450B.145.
(b) “Provider of health care” means a physician, nurse or
physician assistant registered or licensed in this State.
Sec. 13. NRS 450B.805 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.805 1. The health authority may:
(a) Make the data request developed by the Director of the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
439A.116 available to applicants for the renewal of a license as an
attendant or a certificate as an emergency medical responder,
emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical
technician or paramedic through a link on the electronic application
for the renewal of a license or certificate; and
(b) Request each applicant to complete and electronically submit
the data request to the Director.
2. The information provided by an applicant for a renewal of a
license or certificate pursuant to subsection 1 is confidential and,
except as required by subsection 1, must not be disclosed to any
person or entity.
3. An applicant for the renewal of a license or certificate is not
required to complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is
not subject to disciplinary action, including, without limitation,
refusal to renew the license or certificate, for failure to do so.
Sec. 14. NRS 453C.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
453C.100 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a
health care professional otherwise authorized to prescribe an opioid
antagonist may, directly or by standing order, prescribe and dispense
an opioid antagonist to a person at risk of experiencing an opioid-
related drug overdose or to a family member, friend or other person
in a position to assist a person at risk of experiencing an opioid-
related drug overdose. Any such prescription must be regarded as
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
being issued for a legitimate medical purpose in the usual course of
professional practice.
2. A person who, acting in good faith and with reasonable care,
prescribes or dispenses an opioid antagonist pursuant to subsection
1, is not subject to any criminal or civil liability or any professional
disciplinary action for:
(a) Such prescribing or dispensing; or
(b) Any outcomes that result from the eventual administration of
the opioid antagonist.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law:
(a) Any person, including, without limitation, a law enforcement
officer, acting in good faith, may possess and administer an opioid
antagonist to another person whom he or she reasonably believes to
be experiencing an opioid-related drug overdose.
(b) An emergency medical responder, emergency medical
technician, advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic,
as defined in chapter 450B of NRS, is authorized to administer an
opioid antagonist as clinically indicated.
4. A person who, acting in good faith and with reasonable care,
administers an opioid antagonist to another person whom the person
believes to be experiencing an opioid-related drug overdose is
immune from criminal prosecution, sanction under any professional
licensing statute and civil liability for such act.
5. The provisions of this section do not create any duty to
prescribe or dispense an opioid antagonist. A person who declines to
prescribe or dispense an opioid antagonist is not subject to any
criminal or civil liability or any professional discipline for any
reason relating to declining to prescribe or dispense the opioid
antagonist.
Sec. 15. NRS 41.139 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.139 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a
peace officer, firefighter or emergency medical attendant may bring
and maintain an action for damages for personal injury caused by
the willful act of another person, or by another person’s lack of
ordinary care or skill in the management of the person’s property, if
the conduct causing the injury:
(a) Occurred after the person who caused the injury knew or
should have known of the presence of the peace officer, firefighter
or emergency medical attendant;
(b) Was intended to injure the peace officer, firefighter or
emergency medical attendant;
(c) Violated a statute, ordinance or regulation:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
(1) Intended to protect the peace officer, firefighter or
emergency medical attendant; or
(2) Prohibiting resistance to or requiring compliance with an
order of a peace officer or firefighter; or
(d) Was arson.
2. This section does not impose liability on the employer of the
peace officer, firefighter or emergency medical attendant.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Emergency medical attendant” means a person who is:
(1) Licensed as an attendant or certified as an emergency
medical responder, emergency medical technician, advanced
emergency medical technician or paramedic pursuant to chapter
450B of NRS; or
(2) Authorized to practice as an emergency medical
technician, advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic in
this State under the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services
Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact ratified by NRS 450B.145.
(b) “Peace officer” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 169.125.
Sec. 16. NRS 41.1391 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.1391 An attendant, firefighter employed by or serving as a
volunteer with a fire-fighting agency, an emergency medical
responder, emergency medical technician, advanced emergency
medical technician, paramedic or a peace officer who has received
the training required pursuant to NRS 289.605, 450B.160 or
450B.180 shall not be held to a higher standard of care and does not
have a duty greater than had he or she not received the training with
respect to the identification, diagnosis or treatment of a
developmental disability.
Sec. 17. NRS 41.504 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.504 1. Any physician, physician assistant, anesthesiologist
assistant or registered nurse who in good faith gives instruction or
provides supervision to an emergency medical attendant, physician
assistant, anesthesiologist assistant or registered nurse, at the scene
of an emergency or while transporting an ill or injured person from
the scene of an emergency, is not liable for any civil damages as a
result of any act or omission, not amounting to gross negligence, in
giving that instruction or providing that supervision.
2. An emergency medical attendant, physician assistant,
anesthesiologist assistant, registered nurse or licensed practical
nurse who obeys an instruction given by a physician, physician
assistant, anesthesiologist assistant, registered nurse or licensed
practical nurse and thereby renders emergency care, at the scene of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
an emergency or while transporting an ill or injured person from the
scene of an emergency, is not liable for any civil damages as a result
of any act or omission, not amounting to gross negligence, in
rendering that emergency care.
3. As used in this section, “emergency medical attendant”
means a person who is:
(a) Licensed as an attendant or certified as an emergency
medical responder, emergency medical technician, advanced
emergency medical technician or paramedic pursuant to chapter
450B of NRS; or
(b) Authorized to practice as an emergency medical technician,
advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic in this State
under the Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel
Licensure Interstate Compact ratified by NRS 450B.145.
Sec. 18. NRS 193.1677 is hereby amended to read as follows:
193.1677 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 193.169,
any person who willfully violates any provision of NRS 200.030,
200.280, 200.310, 200.366, 200.380, 200.400, 200.460, NRS
200.471 which is punishable as a felony, NRS 200.481 which is
punishable as a felony, NRS 205.0832 which is punishable as a
felony, NRS 205.220, 205.226, 205.228, 205.270 or 206.150
because of the fact that the victim is a first responder may, in
addition to the term of imprisonment prescribed by statute for the
crime, be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 20 years. In determining the length of any additional
penalty imposed, the court shall consider the following information:
(a) The facts and circumstances of the crime;
(b) The criminal history of the person;
(c) The impact of the crime on any victim;
(d) Any mitigating factors presented by the person; and
(e) Any other relevant information.
 The court shall state on the record that it has considered the
information described in paragraphs (a) to (e), inclusive, in
determining the length of any additional penalty imposed.
2. A sentence imposed pursuant to this section:
(a) Must not exceed the sentence imposed for the crime; and
(b) Runs consecutively with the sentence prescribed by statute
for the crime.
3. This section does not create a separate offense but provides
an additional penalty for the primary offense, whose imposition is
contingent upon the finding of the prescribed fact.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
4. As used in this section, “first responder” means any peace
officer, firefighter or emergency medical provider acting in the
normal course of duty. As used in this subsection:
(a) “Emergency medical provider” [has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 450B.199.] means an emergency medical responder,
emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical
technician or paramedic.
(b) “Firefighter” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 450B.071.
(c) “Peace officer” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 169.125.
Sec. 19. NRS 193.1678 is hereby amended to read as follows:
193.1678 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 193.169,
any person who knowingly and willfully violates any provision of
NRS 200.030, 200.280, 200.310, 200.366, 200.380, 200.400,
200.460, NRS 200.471 which is punishable as a felony or NRS
200.481 which is punishable as a felony because of the fact that the
victim is the spouse of a first responder or the child of any age of a
first responder may, in addition to the term of imprisonment
prescribed by statute for the crime, be punished by imprisonment in
the state prison for a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a
maximum term of not more than 20 years. In determining the length
of any additional penalty imposed, the court shall consider the
following information:
(a) The facts and circumstances of the crime;
(b) The criminal history of the person;
(c) The impact of the crime on any victim;
(d) Any mitigating factors presented by the person; and
(e) Any other relevant information.
 The court shall state on the record that it has considered the
information described in paragraphs (a) to (e), inclusive, in
determining the length of any additional penalty imposed.
2. A sentence imposed pursuant to this section:
(a) Must not exceed the sentence imposed for the crime; and
(b) Runs consecutively with the sentence prescribed by statute
for the crime.
3. This section does not create a separate offense but provides
an additional penalty for the primary offense, whose imposition is
contingent upon the finding of the prescribed fact.
4. As used in this section, “first responder” means any peace
officer, firefighter or emergency medical provider. As used in this
subsection:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
(a) “Emergency medical provider” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS [450B.199.] 193.1677.
(b) “Firefighter” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 450B.071.
(c) “Peace officer” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 169.125.
Sec. 20. NRS 200.471 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.471 1. As used in this section:
(a) “Assault” means:
(1) Unlawfully attempting to use physical force against
another person; or
(2) Intentionally placing another person in reasonable
apprehension of immediate bodily harm.
(b) “Fire-fighting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239B.020.
(c) “Health care facility” means a facility licensed pursuant to
chapter 449 of NRS, an office of a person listed in NRS 629.031, a
clinic or any other location, other than a residence, where health
care is provided.
(d) “Officer” means:
(1) A person who possesses some or all of the powers of a
peace officer;
(2) A person employed in a full-time salaried occupation of
fire fighting for the benefit or safety of the public;
(3) A member of a volunteer fire department;
(4) A jailer, guard or other correctional officer of a city or
county jail;
(5) A prosecuting attorney of an agency or political
subdivision of the United States or of this State;
(6) A justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of
Appeals, district judge, justice of the peace, municipal judge,
magistrate, court commissioner, master or referee, including a
person acting pro tempore in a capacity listed in this subparagraph;
(7) An employee of this State or a political subdivision of
this State whose official duties require the employee to make home
visits;
(8) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a law enforcement
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to law enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the law enforcement agency;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
(9) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a fire-fighting
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to fire fighting or fire
prevention; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the fire-fighting agency; or
(10) A civilian employee or volunteer of this State or a
political subdivision of this State whose official duties require the
employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to code enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
this State or a political subdivision of this State.
(e) “Provider of health care” means:
(1) A physician, a medical student, a perfusionist, an
anesthesiologist assistant or a physician assistant licensed pursuant
to chapter 630 of NRS, a practitioner of respiratory care, a
homeopathic physician, an advanced practitioner of homeopathy, a
homeopathic assistant, an osteopathic physician, a physician
assistant or anesthesiologist assistant licensed pursuant to chapter
633 of NRS, a podiatric physician, a podiatry hygienist, a physical
therapist, a medical laboratory technician, an optometrist, a
chiropractic physician, a chiropractic assistant, a naprapath, a doctor
of Oriental medicine, a nurse, a student nurse, a certified nursing
assistant, a nursing assistant trainee, a medication aide - certified, a
person who provides health care services in the home for
compensation, a dentist, a dental student, a dental hygienist, a dental
hygienist student, an expanded function dental assistant, an
expanded function dental assistant student, a pharmacist, a
pharmacy student, an intern pharmacist, an attendant on an
ambulance or air ambulance, a psychologist, a social worker, a
marriage and family therapist, a marriage and family therapist
intern, a clinical professional counselor, a clinical professional
counselor intern, a behavior analyst, an assistant behavior analyst, a
registered behavior technician, a mental health technician, a licensed
dietitian, the holder of a license or a limited license issued under the
provisions of chapter 653 of NRS, a public safety officer at a health
care facility, an emergency medical responder, an emergency
medical technician, an advanced emergency medical technician, a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
paramedic or a participant in a program of training to provide
emergency medical services; or
(2) An employee of or volunteer for a health care facility
who:
(I) Interacts with the public;
(II) Performs tasks related to providing health care; and
(III) Wears identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the person as an employee or volunteer of the health care
facility.
(f) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed person
employed by a board of trustees of a school district pursuant to NRS
391.100 or 391.281.
(g) “Sporting event” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
(h) “Sports official” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
(i) “Taxicab” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 706.8816.
(j) “Taxicab driver” means a person who operates a taxicab.
(k) “Transit operator” means a person who operates a bus or
other vehicle as part of a public mass transportation system.
(l) “Utility worker” means an employee of a public utility as
defined in NRS 704.020 whose official duties require the employee
to:
(1) Interact with the public;
(2) Perform tasks related to the operation of the public
utility; and
(3) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that identifies
the employee as working for the public utility.
2. A person convicted of an assault shall be punished:
(a) If paragraph (c) or (d) does not apply to the circumstances of
the crime and the assault is not made with the use of a deadly
weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a
misdemeanor.
(b) If the assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the
present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
(c) If paragraph (d) does not apply to the circumstances of the
crime and if the assault:
(1) Is committed upon:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
(I) An officer, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a
transit operator or a utility worker who is performing his or her
duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, a provider of health care, a school employee,
a taxicab driver, a transit operator, a utility worker or a sports
official,
 for a gross misdemeanor, unless the assault is made with the use
of a deadly weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon,
then for a category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years, or by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by both
fine and imprisonment.
(d) If the assault:
(1) Is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who is in
lawful custody or confinement or a parolee upon:
(I) An officer, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a
transit operator or a utility worker who is performing his or her
duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The probationer, prisoner or parolee charged knew or
should have known that the victim was an officer, a provider of
health care, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a transit operator, a
utility worker or a sports official,
 for a category D felony as provided in NRS 193.130, unless the
assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the present
ability to use a deadly weapon, then for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
Sec. 21. NRS 244.1605 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.1605 The boards of county commissioners may:
1. Establish, equip and maintain limited medical facilities in
the outlying areas of their respective counties to provide outpatient
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
care and emergency treatment to the residents of and those falling
sick or being injured or maimed in those areas.
2. Provide a full-time or part-time staff for the facilities which
may include a physician, a physician assistant licensed pursuant to
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, an anesthesiologist assistant, a
registered nurse or a licensed practical nurse, a certified emergency
medical responder, emergency medical technician, advanced
emergency medical technician or paramedic, and such other
personnel as the board deems necessary or appropriate to ensure
adequate staffing commensurate with the needs of the area in which
the facility is located.
3. Fix the charges for the medical and nursing care and
medicine furnished by the facility to those who are able to pay for
them, and to provide that care and medicine free of charge to those
persons who qualify as medical indigents under the county’s criteria
of eligibility for medical care.
4. Purchase, equip and maintain, either in connection with a
limited medical facility as authorized in this section or independent
therefrom, ambulances and ambulance services for the benefit of the
residents of and those falling sick or being injured or maimed in the
outlying areas.
Sec. 22. NRS 396.545 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.545 1. To the extent of money available for this purpose,
the Board of Regents shall pay all registration fees, laboratory fees
and expenses for required textbooks and course materials assessed
against or incurred by a dependent child of a public safety officer
who was killed in the line of duty or any other public employee who
was killed in the performance of his or her duties, for classes taken
towards satisfying the requirements of an undergraduate degree at a
school within the System. No such payment may be made for any
fee assessed after the child reaches the age of 23 years.
2. There is hereby created in the State General Fund a Trust
Account for the Education of Dependent Children. The Board of
Regents shall administer the Account. The Board of Regents may
accept gifts and grants for deposit in the Account. All money held
by the State Treasurer or received by the Board of Regents for that
purpose must be deposited in the Account. The money in the
Account must be invested as the money in other state accounts is
invested. After deducting all applicable charges, all interest and
income earned on the money in the Account must be credited to the
Account. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of a fiscal
year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the balance in
the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
3. For each fiscal year, the Board of Regents shall estimate:
(a) The amount of money in the Trust Account that is available
to make payments pursuant to subsection 1 for that fiscal year; and
(b) The anticipated amount of such payments for that fiscal year.
 If the anticipated amount of payments estimated for the fiscal
year exceeds the estimated amount of money available in the
Account in the fiscal year for such payments, the Board of Regents
may request an allocation from the Contingency Account created in
the State General Fund pursuant to NRS 353.266 to cover the
projected shortfall.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Firefighter” means a person who is a salaried employee or
volunteer member of a:
(1) Fire prevention or suppression unit organized by a local
government and whose principal duty is to control and extinguish
fires; or
(2) Fire-fighting agency.
(b) “Fire-fighting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 450B.072.
(c) “Local government” means a county, city, unincorporated
town or metropolitan police department.
(d) “Member of a rescue or emergency medical services crew”
means:
(1) A member of a search and rescue organization in this
State under the direct supervision of any county sheriff;
(2) A person licensed as an attendant pursuant to chapter
450B of NRS if the person is a salaried employee of a public agency
and is not retained under contract to perform services for the public
agency;
(3) A person certified as an emergency medical responder,
emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical
technician or paramedic pursuant to chapter 450B of NRS if the
person is a salaried employee or volunteer of a public agency and is
not retained under contract to perform services for the public
agency; or
(4) A volunteer attendant as that term is defined in
NRS 450B.110.
(e) “Peace officer” means a category I peace officer, category II
peace officer or category III peace officer as those terms are defined
in NRS 289.460, 289.470 and 289.480, respectively.
(f) “Public agency” means an agency, bureau, commission,
department or division of the State of Nevada or a political
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
subdivision of the State of Nevada that provides police, firefighting,
rescue or emergency medical services.
(g) “Public employee” means any person who performs public
duties for compensation paid by or through the State, a county, city,
local government or other political subdivision of the State or an
agency thereof.
(h) “Public employee who was killed in the performance of his
or her duties” includes, without limitation, a public employee who
dies as a result of injuries sustained in the performance of his or her
duties.
(i) “Public safety officer” means a person serving a public
agency in an official capacity, with or without compensation, as a
peace officer, a firefighter or a member of a rescue or emergency
medical services crew.
(j) “Public safety officer who was killed in the line of duty”
includes, without limitation, a public safety officer who dies as a
result of injuries sustained in the line of duty.
Sec. 23. NRS 417.0194 is hereby amended to read as follows:
417.0194 1. Each state agency and regulatory body identified
in subsections 2 to 16, inclusive, shall report, subject to any
limitations or restrictions contained in any state or federal law
governing the privacy or confidentiality of records, the data
identified in subsections 2 to 17, inclusive, as applicable, to the
Interagency Council on Veterans Affairs. Each state agency and
regulatory body shall submit such information for the immediately
preceding fiscal year to the Council not later than November 30 of
each year and shall provide the information in aggregate and in
digital form, and in a manner such that the data is capable of
integration by the Council.
2. The Department of Veterans Services shall provide annual
statistics regarding:
(a) The distribution of expenditures in this State by the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs;
(b) The number of veterans who receive care at a veterans’
home operated by the State;
(c) The number of interments and other services provided by the
veterans’ cemeteries in this State;
(d) The total number of veterans service officers who are
employed by this State and located in this State, by zip code;
(e) The number of claims filed on behalf of veterans and the
family members of veterans by veterans service officers in this
State;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
(f) The amount of annual payments in the form of disability
compensation and pension benefits made to veterans and the family
members of veterans in this State as a result of claims filed by any
veterans service officers employed or managed by the Department
of Veterans Services;
(g) The number of persons who participate as advocates for
veterans in this State in a volunteer program sponsored by the
Department of Veterans Services, by zip code;
(h) The number of employers in this State who participate in a
program sponsored by the Department of Veterans Services that
facilitates the employment of veterans; and
(i) The number of events sponsored or supported by the
Department of Veterans Services held in this State to provide
outreach to veterans regarding benefits, claims and services,
segregated by the geographical location of each event.
3. The Department of Administration shall provide:
(a) Descriptions of and the total amount of the grant dollars
received for veteran-specific programs;
(b) The total combined number of veterans and, to the extent the
information is available, widows and widowers of persons killed in
the line of duty while on active duty in the Armed Forces of the
United States, who are employed by each agency in the State; and
(c) The total number of veterans with service-connected
disabilities who are seeking preferences through the Purchasing
Division and the State Public Works Division of the Department of
Administration pursuant to NRS 333.3366 and 338.13844.
4. The State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources shall provide the total number of veterans receiving:
(a) Expedited certification for the grade I certification
examination for wastewater treatment plant operators based on their
military experience; and
(b) Any discounted fees for access to or the use of state parks.
5. The Department of Corrections shall provide:
(a) An annual overview of the monthly population of inmates in
this State who are veterans; and
(b) The success rates for any efforts developed by the
Incarcerated Veterans Reintegration Council.
6. The Office of Economic Development shall provide an
overview of the workforce that is available statewide of veterans,
organized by O*NET-SOC code from the United States Department
of Labor or the trade, job title, employment status, zip code, county,
highest education level and driver’s license class.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
7. The Department of Education shall provide the distribution
of dependents of service members enrolled in Nevada’s public
schools.
8. The Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation shall provide a summary of:
(a) The average number of veterans served by a veteran
employment specialist of the Department of Employment, Training
and Rehabilitation per week;
(b) The average number of initial and continuing claims for
benefits filed per week by veterans pursuant to NRS 612.455 to
612.530, inclusive;
(c) The average weekly benefit received by veterans receiving
benefits pursuant to chapter 612 of NRS; and
(d) The average duration of a claim by claimants who are
veterans receiving benefits pursuant to chapter 612 of NRS.
9. The Department of Health and Human Services shall
provide:
(a) The total number of veterans who have applied for and
received certification as an Emergency Medical Responder,
Emergency Medical Technician , [-B,] Advanced Emergency
Medical Technician and Paramedic through the State Emergency
Medical Systems program; and
(b) A report from the State Registrar of Vital Statistics setting
forth the suicide mortality rate of veterans in this State.
10. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall provide:
(a) The total number of veterans who have declared themselves
as a veteran and who applied for and received a commercial driver’s
license;
(b) The average monthly total of veteran license plates issued;
and
(c) An overview of the data on veterans collected pursuant to
NRS 483.292, 483.852 and 483.927.
11. The Adjutant General shall provide the total number of:
(a) Members of the Nevada National Guard using waivers for
each semester and identifying which schools accepted the waivers;
and
(b) Members of the Nevada National Guard employed under a
grant from Beyond the Yellow Ribbon.
12. The Department of Public Safety shall provide the
percentage of veterans in each graduating class of its academy for
training peace officers.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
13. The Department of Taxation shall provide the total number
of veterans receiving tax exemptions pursuant to NRS 361.090,
361.091, 361.155, 371.103 and 371.104.
14. The Department of Wildlife shall provide the total number
of:
(a) Veterans holding hunting or fishing licenses based on
disability; and
(b) Service members holding hunting or fishing licenses who are
residents of this State but are stationed outside this State.
15. The Commission on Postsecondary Education shall
provide, by industry, the total number of schools in this State
approved by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs that
are serving veterans.
16. Each regulatory body shall provide the total number of
veterans and service members who have:
(a) Applied for a license from the regulatory body.
(b) Been issued a license by the regulatory body.
(c) Renewed a license with the regulatory body.
17. Each state agency and regulatory body identified in
subsections 2 to 16, inclusive, shall ensure that the form used to
collect data from a veteran, including, without limitation, a digital
form posted on an Internet website, includes the following
questions:
(a) “Have you ever served on active duty in the Armed Forces of
the United States and separated from such service under conditions
other than dishonorable?”
(b) “Have you ever been assigned to duty for a minimum of 6
continuous years in the National Guard or a reserve component of
the Armed Forces of the United States and separated from such
service under conditions other than dishonorable?”
(c) “Have you ever served the Commissioned Corps of the
United States Public Health Service or the Commissioned Corps of
the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration of the United
States in the capacity of a commissioned officer while on active
duty in defense of the United States and separated from such service
under conditions other than dishonorable?”
18. The Council shall, upon receiving the information
submitted pursuant to this section and NRS 612.237, synthesize and
compile the information, including any recommendations of the
Council, and submit the information with the report submitted
pursuant to subsection 7 of NRS 417.0195.
19. As used in this section:
(a) “License” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 622.030.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
(b) “Regulatory body” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 622.060.
(c) “Service member” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 125C.0635.
Sec. 24. NRS 484B.767 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.767 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
peace officer, a firefighter, an emergency medical responder, an
emergency medical technician, an advanced emergency medical
technician or a paramedic certified pursuant to chapter 450B of NRS
or authorized to practice in this State under the Recognition of
Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate
Compact ratified by NRS 450B.145 or an employee of a pedestrian
mall, who operates a bicycle, an electric bicycle or an electric
scooter while on duty, is not required to comply with any provision
of NRS or any ordinance of a local government relating to the
operation of a bicycle, an electric bicycle or an electric scooter
while on duty if he or she:
(a) Is responding to an emergency call or the peace officer is in
pursuit of a suspected violator of the law; or
(b) Determines that noncompliance with any such provision is
necessary to carry out his or her duties.
2. The provisions of this section do not:
(a) Relieve a peace officer, firefighter, emergency medical
responder, emergency medical technician, advanced emergency
medical technician, paramedic or employee of a pedestrian mall
from the duty to operate a bicycle, an electric bicycle or an electric
scooter with due regard for the safety of others.
(b) Protect such a person from the consequences of the person’s
disregard for the safety of others.
3. As used in this section, “pedestrian mall” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 268.811.
Sec. 25. NRS 616A.035 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616A.035 1. “Accident benefits” means medical, surgical,
hospital or other treatments, nursing, medicine, medical and surgical
supplies, crutches and apparatuses, including prosthetic devices.
2. The term includes:
(a) Medical benefits as defined by NRS 617.130;
(b) Preventive treatment administered as a precaution to an
employee who is exposed to a contagious disease while providing
medical services, including emergency medical care, in the course
and scope of his or her employment;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 28 –
(c) Preventive treatment administered as a precaution to a police
officer, a salaried or volunteer firefighter or an arson investigator
who:
(1) Was exposed to a contagious disease:
(I) Upon battery by an offender; or
(II) While performing the duties of a police officer,
firefighter or arson investigator,
 if the exposure is documented by the creation and maintenance of
a report concerning the exposure pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS
616C.052; or
(2) Tests positive for exposure to tuberculosis or another
contagious disease under the circumstances described in subsection
2 or 3 of NRS 616C.052; and
(d) Preventive treatment for hepatitis administered as a
precaution to a police officer, full-time salaried firefighter, arson
investigator or emergency medical attendant employed in this State.
3. The term does not include:
(a) Exercise equipment, a hot tub or a spa for an employee’s
home;
(b) Membership in an athletic or health club;
(c) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616C.245, a motor
vehicle; or
(d) The costs of operating a motor vehicle provided pursuant to
NRS 616C.245, fees related to the operation or licensing of the
motor vehicle or insurance for the motor vehicle.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Battery” includes, without limitation, the intentional
propelling or placing, or the causing to be propelled or placed, of
any human excrement or bodily fluid upon the person of an
employee.
(b) “Emergency medical attendant” means a person licensed as
an attendant or certified as an emergency medical responder,
emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical
technician or paramedic pursuant to chapter 450B of NRS, whose
primary duties of employment are the provision of emergency
medical services.
(c) “Hepatitis” includes hepatitis A, hepatitis B, hepatitis C and
any additional diseases or conditions that are associated with or
result from hepatitis A, hepatitis B or hepatitis C.
(d) “Preventive treatment” includes, without limitation:
(1) Tests to determine if an employee has contracted hepatitis
or any other contagious disease to which the employee was exposed;
and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 29 –
(2) If an employee tests positive for exposure to tuberculosis
under the circumstances described in NRS 616C.052, such
medication and chest X-rays as are recommended by the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention of the United States Department of
Health and Human Services.
Sec. 26. NRS 616C.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.180 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, an
injury or disease sustained by an employee that is caused by stress is
compensable pursuant to the provisions of chapters 616A to 616D,
inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS if it arose out of and in the course
of his or her employment.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, any ailment or
disorder caused by any gradual mental stimulus, and any death
or disability ensuing therefrom, shall be deemed not to be an injury
or disease arising out of and in the course of employment.
3. Except as otherwise provided by subsections 4 and 5, an
injury or disease caused by stress shall be deemed to arise out of and
in the course of employment only if the employee proves by clear
and convincing medical or psychiatric evidence that:
(a) The employee has a mental injury caused by extreme stress
in time of danger;
(b) The primary cause of the injury was an event that arose out
of and during the course of his or her employment; and
(c) The stress was not caused by his or her layoff, the
termination of his or her employment or any disciplinary action
taken against him or her.
4. An injury or disease caused by stress shall be deemed to
arise out of and in the course of employment if the employee is a
first responder and proves by clear and convincing medical or
psychiatric evidence that:
(a) The employee has a mental injury caused by extreme stress
due to the employee directly witnessing:
(1) The death, or the aftermath of the death, of a person as a
result of a violent event, including, without limitation, a homicide,
suicide or mass casualty incident; or
(2) An injury, or the aftermath of an injury, that involves
grievous bodily harm of a nature that shocks the conscience; and
(b) The primary cause of the mental injury was the employee
witnessing an event or a series of events described in paragraph (a)
during the course of his or her employment.
5. An injury or disease caused by stress shall be deemed to
arise out of and in the course of employment, and shall not be
deemed the result of gradual mental stimulus, if the employee is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 30 –
employed by the State or any of its agencies or political subdivisions
and proves by clear and convincing medical or psychiatric evidence
that:
(a) The employee has a mental injury caused by extreme stress
due to the employee responding to a mass casualty incident; and
(b) The primary cause of the injury was the employee
responding to the mass casualty incident during the course of his or
her employment.
6. An agency which employs a first responder, including,
without limitation, a first responder who serves as a volunteer, shall
provide educational training to the first responder related to the
awareness, prevention, mitigation and treatment of mental health
issues.
7. The provisions of this section do not apply to a person who
is claiming compensation pursuant to NRS 617.457.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Directly witness” means to see or hear for oneself.
(b) “First responder” means:
(1) A salaried or volunteer firefighter;
(2) A police officer;
(3) An emergency dispatcher or call taker who is employed
by a law enforcement or public safety agency in this State; or
(4) An emergency medical responder, emergency medical
technician or paramedic who is employed by a public safety agency
in this State.
(c) “Mass casualty incident” means an event that, for the
purposes of emergency response or operations, is designated as a
mass casualty incident by one or more governmental agencies that
are responsible for public safety or for emergency response.
Sec. 27. NRS 617.485 is hereby amended to read as follows:
617.485 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter and except as otherwise provided in this section, if an
employee has hepatitis, the disease is conclusively presumed to have
arisen out of and in the course of his or her employment if the
employee has been continuously employed for 5 years or more as a
police officer, full-time salaried firefighter or emergency medical
attendant in this State before the date of any temporary or permanent
disability or death resulting from the hepatitis.
2. Compensation awarded to a police officer, firefighter or
emergency medical attendant, or to the dependents of such a person,
for hepatitis pursuant to this section must include:
(a) Full reimbursement for related expenses incurred for medical
treatments, surgery and hospitalization; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 31 –
(b) The compensation provided in chapters 616A to 616D,
inclusive, of NRS for the disability or death.
3. A police officer, salaried firefighter or emergency medical
attendant shall:
(a) Submit to a blood test to screen for hepatitis C upon
employment, upon the commencement of coverage and thereafter on
an annual basis during his or her employment.
(b) Submit to a blood test to screen for hepatitis A and hepatitis
B upon employment, upon the commencement of coverage and
thereafter on an annual basis during his or her employment, except
that a police officer, salaried firefighter or emergency medical
attendant is not required to submit to a blood test to screen for
hepatitis A and hepatitis B on an annual basis during his or her
employment if he or she has been vaccinated for hepatitis A and
hepatitis B upon employment or at other medically appropriate
times during his or her employment. Each employer shall provide a
police officer, salaried firefighter or emergency medical attendant
with the opportunity to be vaccinated for hepatitis A and hepatitis B
upon employment and at other medically appropriate times during
his or her employment.
4. All blood tests required pursuant to this section and all
vaccinations provided pursuant to this section must be paid for by
the employer.
5. The provisions of this section:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), do not apply
to a police officer, firefighter or emergency medical attendant who
is diagnosed with hepatitis upon employment.
(b) Apply to a police officer, firefighter or emergency medical
attendant who is diagnosed with hepatitis upon employment if,
during the employment or within 1 year after the last day of the
employment, he or she is diagnosed with a different strain of
hepatitis.
(c) Apply to a police officer, firefighter or emergency medical
attendant who is diagnosed with hepatitis after the termination of the
employment if the diagnosis is made within 1 year after the last day
of the employment.
6. A police officer, firefighter or emergency medical attendant
who is determined to be:
(a) Partially disabled from an occupational disease pursuant to
the provisions of this section; and
(b) Incapable of performing, with or without remuneration, work
as a police officer, firefighter or emergency medical attendant,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 32 –
 may elect to receive the benefits provided pursuant to NRS
616C.440 for a permanent total disability.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Emergency medical attendant” means a person licensed as
an attendant or certified as an emergency medical responder,
emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical
technician or paramedic pursuant to chapter 450B of NRS, whose
primary duties of employment are the provision of emergency
medical services.
(b) “Hepatitis” includes hepatitis A, hepatitis B, hepatitis C and
any additional diseases or conditions that are associated with or
result from hepatitis A, hepatitis B or hepatitis C.
(c) “Police officer” means a sheriff, deputy sheriff, officer of a
metropolitan police department or city police officer.
Sec. 28. NRS 629.031 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.031 Except as otherwise provided by a specific statute:
1. “Provider of health care” means:
(a) A physician licensed pursuant to chapter 630, 630A or 633
of NRS;
(b) A physician assistant;
(c) An anesthesiologist assistant;
(d) A dentist;
(e) A dental therapist;
(f) A dental hygienist;
(g) A licensed nurse;
(h) A person who holds a license as an attendant or who is
certified as an emergency medical responder, emergency medical
technician, advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic
pursuant to chapter 450B of NRS or authorized to practice as an
emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical
technician or paramedic in this State under the Recognition of
Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate
Compact ratified by NRS 450B.145;
(i) A dispensing optician;
(j) An optometrist;
(k) A speech-language pathologist;
(l) An audiologist;
(m) A practitioner of respiratory care;
(n) A licensed physical therapist;
(o) An occupational therapist;
(p) A podiatric physician;
(q) A licensed psychologist;
(r) A licensed marriage and family therapist;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 33 –
(s) A licensed clinical professional counselor;
(t) A music therapist;
(u) A chiropractic physician;
(v) An athletic trainer;
(w) A perfusionist;
(x) A doctor of Oriental medicine in any form;
(y) A medical laboratory director or technician;
(z) A pharmacist;
(aa) A licensed dietitian;
(bb) An associate in social work, a social worker, a master social
worker, an independent social worker or a clinical social worker
licensed pursuant to chapter 641B of NRS;
(cc) An alcohol and drug counselor or a problem gambling
counselor who is certified pursuant to chapter 641C of NRS;
(dd) An alcohol and drug counselor or a clinical alcohol and
drug counselor who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641C of NRS;
(ee) A behavior analyst, assistant behavior analyst or registered
behavior technician;
(ff) A naprapath; or
(gg) A medical facility as the employer of any person specified
in this subsection.
2. For the purposes of NRS 629.400 to 629.490, inclusive, the
term includes a person who holds a current license or certificate to
practice his or her respective discipline pursuant to the applicable
provisions of law of another state or territory of the United States.
Sec. 29. A person who, on January 1, 2026, holds a valid
certificate as an emergency medical responder issued pursuant to
NAC 450B.355 may continue to practice as an emergency medical
responder until his or her certificate expires. Such a person may
renew his or her certificate in accordance with NRS 450B.180, as
amended by section 8 of this act, if he or she completes the training
required by paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection 3 of that section
before he or she applies for renewal.
Sec. 30. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 29, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)